Washington statutes.
RCW 15.88.090

Campaign goals.

The commission shall adopt as major objectives of its research, promotional, and educational campaign such goals as will serve the needs of producers, which may include, without limitation, efforts to:

(1) Establish Washington wine as a major factor in markets everywhere;

(2) Promote Washington wineries as tourist attractions;

(3) Encourage favorable reporting of Washington wine and wineries in the press throughout the world;

(4) Establish the state in markets everywhere as a major source of premium wine;

(5) Encourage favorable legislative and regulatory treatment of Washington wine in markets everywhere;

(6) Foster economic conditions favorable to investment in the production of vinifera grapes and Washington wine;

(7) Advance knowledge and practice of production of wine grapes in this state;

(8) Discover and develop new and improved vines for the reliable and economical production of wine grapes in the state; and

(9) Advance knowledge and practice of the processing of wine grapes in the state.

[ 1987 c 452 s 9.]